Idaho, session 2025, H0097.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 10, Title 46, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 46-1008A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
46-1008A. EVACUATION ORDERS -- VOLUNTARY NONCOMPLIANCE. (1) Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, a person may choose not
to evacuate his home despite being ordered or compelled to do so pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A person who chooses not to evacuate pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section shall:
(a) Accept all of the risks and liabilities of his decision not to evac-
uate; and
(b) Reimburse a governmental entity, or a nonprofit agency cooperating
with a governmental entity, if such entity conducts a rescue on behalf
of a person who previously chose not to evacuate despite being ordered
or compelled to do so pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.